Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1471
Contribution or expenditure in excess of fifty dollars; not to be made in cash; violation; penalty.

A contribution or expenditure of more than fifty dollars shall not be made or accepted in cash. Contributions and expenditures of more than fifty dollars, other than an in-kind contribution or expenditure, shall be made by written instrument containing the names of the payor and the payee. Any person who knowingly violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 71;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 44.